nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Musikkinstrumenter > Strengeinstrumenter > Ukuleler: Barytonukuleler; Bassukuleler; Konsertukuleler; Elektriske ukuleler; Lommeukuleler; Sopranukuleler; Tenorukuleler
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Μουσικά όργανα > Έγχορδα όργανα > Ουκουλέλε: Ουκουλέλε Βαρύτονο; Μπάσο ουκουλέλε; Ουκουλέλε Concert; Ηλεκτρικά oυκουλέλε; Ουκουλέλε τσέπης; Ουκουλέλε Soprano; Ουκουλέλε Tenor
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instruments > String Instruments > Ukuleles: Baritone Ukuleles; Bass Ukuleles; Concert Ukuleles; Electric Ukuleles; Pocket Ukuleles; Soprano Ukuleles; Tenor Ukuleles
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Музыкальные инструменты > Струнные инструменты > Укулеле: Баритон-укулеле; Бас-укулеле; Концертные укулеле; Электрические укулеле; Карманные укулеле; Сопрано-укулеле; Тенор-укулеле
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Muziekinstrumenten > Snaarinstrumenten > Ukuleles: Bariton ukeleles; Bas ukuleles; Concert ukuleles; Elektrische ukeleles; Zak ukeleles; Soprano ukuleles; Tenor ukeleles
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Instrumentos musicais > Instrumentos de corda > Ukuleles: Ukeleles Barítono; Ukeleles Baixo; Ukuleles Concerto; Ukeleles Elétricos; Ukeleles mini; Ukuleles Soprano; Ukuleles Tenor
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Nhạc cụ > Nhạc cụ bộ dây > Đàn ukulele: Đàn ukulele giọng nam trung; Đàn ukulele bass; Đàn ukulele hòa nhạc; Đàn ukulele điện; Đàn ukulele bỏ túi; Đàn ukulele giọng nữ cao; Đàn ukulele giọng nam cao
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器 > 弦乐器 > 尤克里里: 低音尤克里里; 贝斯尤克里里; 中音尤克里里; 电尤克里里; 迷你尤克里里; 高音尤克里里; 次中音尤克里里
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soittimet > Jousisoittimet > Ukulelet: Baritoniukulelet; Bassoukulelet; Konserttiukulelet; Sähköukulelet; Tasku-ukulelet; Sopraanoukulelet; Tenoriukulelet
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai > Styginiai instrumentai > Ukulelės: Baritonų ukulelės; Bosų ukulelės; Koncertinės ukulelės; Elektrinės ukulelės; Kišeninės ukulelės; Sopranų ukulelės; Tenorų ukulelės
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Instrumentos musicales > Instrumentos de cuerda > Ukeleles: Ukeleles barítonos; Ukeleles bajo; Ukeleles concierto; Ukeleles eléctricos; Ukeleles de bolsillo; Ukeleles soprano; Ukeleles tenor
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Instruments de musique > Instruments à cordes > Ukulélés: Ukulélés baryton; Ukulélés basses; Ukulélés de concert; Ukulélés électriques; Ukulélés de poche; Ukulélés soprano; Ukulélés ténor
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรี > เครื่องสาย > อูคูเลเล่: อูคูเลเล่บาริโทน; อูคูเลเล่เบส; อูคูเลเล่คอนเสิร์ต; อูคูเลเล่ไฟฟ้า; อูคูเลเล่ขนาดพกพา; อูคูเลเล่โซปราโน; อูคูเลเล่เทเนอร์
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Instrumente muzicale > Instrumente cu coarde > Ukulele: Ukulele bariton; Ukulele bas; Ukulele de concert; Ukulele electrice; Ukulele de buzunar; Ukulele soprană; Ukulele tenor
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszerek > Vonós hangszerek > Ukulelék: Bariton ukulelék; Basszus ukulelék; Koncertukulelék; Elektromos ukulelék; Zsebukulelék; Szoprán ukulelék; Tenor ukulelék
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Musikinstrument > Stränginstrument > Ukuleler: Baryton-ukuleler; Bas-ukuleler; Konsert-ukuleler; Elektriska ukuleler; Fick-ukuleler; Sopran-ukuleler; Tenor-ukuleler
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Strumenti musicali > Strumenti a corda > Ukulele: Ukulele baritono; Ukulele basso; Ukulele da concerto; Ukulele elettrici; Ukulele tascabili; Ukulele soprano; Ukulele tenore
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aletleri > Telli Çalgılar > Ukuleleler: Bariton Ukuleleler; Bass Ukuleleler; Konser Ukuleleleri; Elektro Ukuleleler; Cep Ukuleleleri; Soprano Ukuleleler; Tenor Ukuleleler
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Musikinstrumente > Saiteninstrumente > Ukulelen: Bariton-Ukulelen; Bass-Ukulelen; Konzert-Ukulelen; Elektrische Ukulelen; Taschen-Ukulelen; Sopran-Ukulelen; Tenor-Ukulelen
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기 > 현악기 > 우쿨렐레: 바리톤 우쿨렐레; 베이스 우쿨렐레; 콘서트 우쿨렐레; 전자 우쿨렐레; 포켓 우쿨렐레; 소프라노 우쿨렐레; 테너 우쿨렐레
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Hudobné nástroje > Sláčikové nástroje > Ukulele: Barytónové ukulele; Basové ukulele; Koncertné ukulele; Elektrické ukulele; Vreckové ukulele; Sopránové ukulele; Tenorové ukulele
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Музикални инструменти > Струнни инструменти > Укулеле: Баритон укулеле; Бас укулеле; Концертни укулеле; Електрически укулеле; Джобни укулеле; Сопрано укулеле; Тенор укулеле
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter > Strengeinstrumenter > Ukuleler: Bariton ukulele; Bass ukulele; Koncert ukulele; Elektrisk ukulele; Lomme-ukulele; Soprano ukulele; Tenor ukulele
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器 > 弦楽器 > ウクレレ: バリトンウクレレ; バスウクレレ; コンサートウクレレ; エレクトリックウクレレ; ポケットウクレレ; ソプラノウクレレ; テノールウクレレ
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Glasbila > Godala > Ukulele: Baritonske ukulele; Bas ukulele; Koncertne ukulele; Električne ukulele; Majhne ukulele; Sopranske ukulele; Tenorske ukulele
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Glazbala > Gudački instrumenti > Ukulele: Baritonski ukulele; Bas ukulele; Koncertni ukulele; Električni ukulele; Džepni ukulele; Sopranski ukulele; Tenorski ukulele
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器 > 弦樂 > 烏克麗麗琴: 中音烏克麗麗琴; 低音烏克麗麗琴; 音樂會烏克麗麗琴; 電子烏克麗麗琴; 口袋烏克麗麗琴; 高音烏克麗麗琴; 次中音烏克麗麗琴
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje > Strunné nástroje > Ukulele: Barytonová ukulele; Basová ukulele; Koncertní ukulele; Elektrická ukulele; Kapesní ukulele; Sopránová ukulele; Tenorová ukulele
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Instrumenty muzyczne > Instrumenty strunowe > Ukulele: Ukulele barytonowe; Ukulele basowe; Ukulele koncertowe; Ukulele elektryczne; Ukulele kieszonkowe; Ukulele sopranowe; Ukulele tenorowe
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Instrumentos musicais > Instrumentos de corda > Ukuleles: Ukuleles barítono; Ukuleles baixo; Ukuleles concert; Ukuleles elétricos; Ukuleles compacto; Ukuleles soprano; Ukuleles tenor